Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 3 Employment First Georgia Council

Effective date. —

This article became effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 766, § 1/HB 831, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Georgia’s Employment First Act.’”

Ga. L. 2018, p. 766, § 2/HB 831, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that competitive integrated employment, including self-employment, in the general workforce is the first and preferred option in the provision of publicly funded services for all working age citizens with disabilities, regardless of the level of disability.”

49-9-50.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Competitive integrated employment” means work, including self-employment, in the labor market performed on a full-time or part-time basis in a setting in which an individual with a disability interacts with individuals without disabilities in all aspects of the job function and for which such individual with a disability is compensated at or above the level of salary and benefits paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by individuals without disabilities.

“Council” means the Employment First Georgia Council established pursuant to Code Section 49-9-51.

“Disability” means a permanent physical, cognitive, or behavioral condition that significantly limits one or more functions of daily living.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-9-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 766, § 3/HB 831.

49-9-51.
Creation of Employment First Georgia Council; membership; operation.

There is created the Employment First Georgia Council. The council shall be assigned to the Department of Human Services for administrative purposes only, as defined by Code Section 50-4-3; provided, however, that the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall provide staff and administrative and clerical functions for the council.

The Employment First Georgia Council shall be composed of 14 members as follows:

The executive director of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency or his or her designee, who shall serve as chairperson of the council;

The commissioner of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or his or her designee;

The Commissioner of Labor or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Technical College System of Georgia or his or her designee;

The Chancellor of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or his or her designee;

The State School Superintendent or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Georgia Council for Developmental Disabilities or his or her designee;

A representative of an association or other organization of community rehabilitation providers that assist individuals with disabilities in overcoming barriers to employment;

A representative of an association or other organization that provides supported employment and nonemployment day services to individuals with disabilities;

A representative from the business community;

An individual with an intellectual or developmental disability;

An individual with a physical disability;

An individual from the mental health community; and

A family member of an individual with a disability.

The members of the council in paragraphs (8) through (14) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be residents of this state. Such members shall be appointed by the Governor and serve for a term of three years or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

If there is a vacancy on the council, such position shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The council shall annually elect from its membership a vice chairperson and such other officers as it deems appropriate. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum at any meeting held by the council. The chairperson shall vote only to break a tie.

The council may conduct meetings at such places and times as it deems necessary or convenient to enable it to exercise fully and effectively its powers, perform its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of this chapter. The council shall hold meetings at the call of the chairperson, the executive director of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, or upon written request of a majority of the members. The council shall meet no less than four times each year.

Each member of the board shall be entitled to receive the compensation and allowances provided for in Code Section 28-1-8. Members of the council who are state officials or state employees shall receive no compensation for their services on the council, but may be reimbursed for expenses they incur in the performance of their duties as members of the council in the same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their capacities as state officials or employees.

The chairperson may designate and appoint committees from among the membership of the council and may appoint nonmembers of the council to advisory committees to advise the council on the fulfillment of its duties. The members of the advisory committees shall not receive any per diem or reimbursements; provided, however, that such members shall be entitled to receive the mileage allowance provided for in Code Section 50-19-7 for the use of a personal car in connection with attendance at meetings called by the council.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, with the concurrence of the council, shall have the authority to employ such administrative staff, consultants, subject matter experts, economists, budget analysts, data analysts, statisticians, and other individuals or organizations deemed appropriate and necessary to carry out the functions of the council within the limits of the appropriations made to the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-9-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 766, § 3/HB 831.

49-9-52.
Purpose of council; “Employment First Policy” or “Employment First.”

The purpose of the Employment First Georgia Council shall be to advise the Governor, General Assembly, and state agencies as to the adoption and integration of a policy that recognizes that competitive integrated employment, including self-employment, is the first and preferred option of all state funded services provided to working age individuals with disabilities. Such policy shall be known as the “Employment First Policy” or “Employment First.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-9-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 766, § 3/HB 831.

49-9-53.
Powers, duties, and responsibilities of council.

The council shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities to:

Develop an Employment First training plan for providers of services to individuals with disabilities;

Coordinate and conduct with other state, federal, and private entities, as appropriate, educational activities to increase awareness of the Employment First Policy;

Evaluate the funding mechanism for services in the state for individuals with disabilities and for students attending inclusive postsecondary institutions;

Review and make recommendations in a biannual report to the Governor and the General Assembly with regard to issues and necessary steps surrounding the adoption and implementation of the Employment First Policy, including, but not limited to, the following:

Proposed legislative or administrative changes to policies and programs that are integral to the full implementations of the Employment First Policy;

Proposed changes to or creation of funding mechanisms and other initiatives for services in the state for individuals with disabilities and for students attending inclusive postsecondary institutions; and

State-wide best practices to ensure that providers of services are facilitating competitive integrated employment in the workforce; and

Carry out any other functions assigned to the council by the Governor or by general law.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-9-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 766, § 3/HB 831.